Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.070

Meetings—Energy supply alert or energy emergency—Duties.

(1) The committee shall meet and function at the following times: (a) At least once per year or at anytime upon the call of the chair to receive information related to the state or regional energy supply situation; (b) during a condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency; and (c) upon the call of the chair, in response to gubernatorial action to terminate such a condition. Upon the declaration by the governor of a condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency, the committee shall meet to receive any plans proposed by the governor for programs, controls, standards, and priorities for the production, allocation, and consumption of energy during any current or anticipated condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency, any proposed plans for the suspension or modification of existing rules of the Washington Administrative Code, and any other relevant matters the governor deems desirable. The committee shall review such plans and matters and shall transmit its recommendations to the governor for review. The committee may review any voluntary programs or local or regional programs for the production, allocation, or consumption of energy which have been submitted to the committee.

(2) The committee shall receive any request from the governor for the approval of a declaration of a condition of energy emergency as provided in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended and shall either approve or disapprove such request.

(3) During a condition of energy supply alert, the committee shall: (a) Receive any request from the governor for an extension of the condition of energy supply alert for an additional period of time not to exceed ninety consecutive days and the findings upon which such request is based; (b) receive any request from the governor for subsequent extensions of the condition of energy supply alert for an additional period of time not to exceed one hundred twenty consecutive days and the findings upon which such a request is based; and (c) either approve or disapprove the requested extensions. When approving a request, the committee may specify a longer period than requested, up to ninety days for initial extensions and one hundred twenty days for additional extensions.

(4) During a condition of energy emergency the committee shall: (a) Receive any request from the governor for an extension of the condition of energy emergency for an additional period of time not to exceed forty-five consecutive days and the finding upon which any such request is based; (b) receive any request from the governor for subsequent extensions of the condition of energy emergency for an additional period of time not to exceed sixty consecutive days and the findings upon which such a request is based; and (c) either approve or disapprove the requested extensions. When approving a request, the committee may specify a longer period than requested, up to forty-five days for initial extensions and sixty days for additional extensions.

[ 2005 c 299 s 2; 2002 c 192 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 299: See note following RCW 44.39.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.